Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 10
STATE DISASTER PREPAREDNESS ACT

Sec.

§ 46-1001. Short title.

This act shall be cited as the “Idaho Disaster Preparedness Act of 1975, amended by the Idaho Homeland Security Act of 2004.”

§ 46-1002. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adjutant general” means the administrative head of the military division of the office of the governor.

“Disaster” means occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any natural or man-made cause, including but not limited to fire, flood, earthquake, windstorm, wave action, volcanic activity, explosion, riot, or hostile military or paramilitary action and including acts of terrorism.

“Emergency” means occurrence or imminent threat of a disaster or condition threatening life or property that requires state emergency assistance to supplement local efforts to save lives and protect property or to avert or lessen the threat of a disaster.

“Political subdivision” means any county, city, district, or other unit of state or local government.

“Militia” means all members of the Idaho army and air national guard in the service of the state.

“Office” means the Idaho office of emergency management within the military division.

“Search and rescue” means the employment, coordination, and utilization of available resources and personnel in locating, relieving distress and preserving life of, and removing survivors from the site of a disaster, emergency or hazard to a place of safety in case of lost, stranded, entrapped, or injured persons.

“Disaster emergency account” means the account created under this act for the purpose of paying obligations and expenses incurred by the state of Idaho during a declared state of disaster emergency.

“Bureau of hazardous materials” means the former bureau of hazardous materials, which is now a part of the Idaho office of emergency management in the military division of the office of the governor.

§ 46-1003. Policy and purposes.

It is the policy of this state to plan and prepare for disasters and emergencies resulting from natural or man-made causes, enemy attack, terrorism, sabotage or other hostile action, and to implement this policy, it is found necessary:

To create an Idaho office of emergency management, to authorize the creation of local organizations for disaster preparedness in the political subdivisions of the state, and to authorize the state and political subdivisions to execute agreements and to cooperate with the federal government and the governments of other states.

To prevent and reduce damage, injury, and loss of life and property resulting from natural or man-made catastrophes, riots, or hostile military or paramilitary action.

To prepare assistance for prompt and efficient search, rescue, care, and treatment of persons injured, victimized or threatened by disaster.

To provide for rapid and orderly restoration and rehabilitation of persons and property affected by disasters.

To prescribe the roles of the governor, state agencies, and local governments in prevention of, preparation for, response to and recovery from disasters.

To authorize and encourage cooperation in disaster prevention, preparedness, response and recovery.

To provide for coordination of activities relating to disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery by all state agencies, political subdivisions, and interstate, federal-state and Canadian activities in which the state and its political subdivisions may participate.

To provide a disaster management system embodying all aspects of predisaster preparedness and postdisaster response.

To provide for the payment of obligations and expenses incurred by the state of Idaho through the Idaho office of emergency management during a declared state of disaster emergency.

§ 46-1004. Idaho office of emergency management created.

Within the military division of the office of governor, an Idaho office of emergency management is established.

§ 46-1005. Coordinating officer — Selection.

The office may be headed by the adjutant general as chief of the military division, or by a coordinating officer selected by the adjutant general with the concurrence of the governor. If the adjutant general serves as chief of the office, he or she shall receive no additional compensation.

§ 46-1005A. Disaster emergency account.

There is hereby created and established in the state treasury a separate account to be known as the disaster emergency account which account shall be administered by the governor or his designee. The account shall only be used to pay obligations and expenses incurred by the state of Idaho during a declared state of disaster emergency.

In order to pay said obligations and expenses in coping with a declared state of disaster emergency the governor shall expend state money as follows:

The governor shall use any moneys available in the disaster emergency account.

In the event the disaster emergency account is inadequate to satisfy said obligations and expenses, the governor is empowered to direct, by executive order, the state controller to transfer moneys from the general account [general fund], created pursuant to section 67-1205, Idaho Code, to the disaster emergency account, provided that in the governor’s judgment sufficient general account moneys will be available to support the full general account appropriations for the current fiscal year.

In addition to any purpose for which they have previously been created, all funds excluding constitutionally created funds, or funds limited in their application by the constitution of the state of Idaho, are hereby expressly declared to be appropriated for the purpose of effectuating the purposes of this act. If the moneys made available in paragraphs (a) and (b) above are inadequate to meet the above mentioned obligations and expenses, the governor is empowered to direct the state controller, by executive order, to transfer to the disaster emergency account moneys from any eligible account in order to pay said obligations and expenses; provided, that in the governor’s judgment, the moneys transferred are not required to support the current year’s appropriation of the affected accounts.

In the event that restitution is made to the state from nonstate sources to reimburse the state for costs incurred in responding to a state of disaster emergency, the governor may use funds from the restitution to reimburse accounts from which funds were drawn to pay for the state’s response to the emergency.

In addition to any other purpose for which they might have been appropriated, all moneys made available by this act to be used in the event of a disaster emergency are hereby perpetually appropriated for the purpose set forth in this section according to the limitations established by this section and the constitution of the state of Idaho. In no event may the revenues made available by section 46-1005A (2)(b) and (c), Idaho Code, for any and all emergency purposes exceed, during any fiscal year, one percent (1%) of the annual appropriation of general account [general fund] moneys for that fiscal year.

§ 46-1006. Powers and duties of chief and office.

In all matters of disaster services, the adjutant general shall represent the governor and shall, on behalf of the governor, coordinate the activities of all of the state agencies in disaster services. The office shall have a coordinating officer and other professional, technical, secretarial and clerical employees necessary for the performance of its functions.

The office shall prepare, maintain and update a state disaster plan based on the principle of self-help at each level of government. The plan may provide for:

Prevention and minimization of injury and damage caused by disaster;

Prompt and effective response to disaster;

Emergency relief;

Identification of areas particularly vulnerable to disasters;

Assistance to local officials in designing local emergency action plans;

Authorization and procedures for the erection or other construction of temporary works designed to protect against or mitigate danger, damage, or loss from disaster;

Preparation and distribution to the appropriate state and local officials of catalogs of federal, state and private assistance programs;

Assistance to local officials in designing plans for search, rescue, and recovery of persons lost, entrapped, victimized, or threatened by disaster;

Organization of manpower and chains of command;

Coordination of federal, state, and local disaster activities;

Coordination of the state disaster plan with the disaster plans of the federal government.

The office shall participate in the development and revision of local and intergovernmental disaster plans. To this end, it may employ or otherwise secure the services of professional and technical personnel to provide expert assistance to political subdivisions, their disaster agencies, and intergovernmental planning and disaster agencies. This personnel shall consult with subdivisions and agencies and shall make field examinations of the areas, circumstances, and conditions to which particular local and intergovernmental disaster plans are intended to apply.

In preparing and maintaining the state disaster plan, the office shall seek the advice and assistance of local government, business, labor, industry, agriculture, civic, and volunteer organizations and community leaders. In advising local and intergovernmental agencies, the office shall encourage them also to seek advice from these sources.

The state disaster plan or any part thereof may be incorporated in rules of the office promulgated subject to chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

The office shall:

Promulgate standards and criteria for local and intergovernmental disaster plans;

Periodically review local and intergovernmental disaster plans;

Assist political subdivisions, their disaster agencies, and intergovernmental disaster agencies to establish and operate training programs and programs of public information;

Plan and make arrangements for the availability and use of any private facilities, services, and property and, if necessary and if in fact used, provide for payment for use under terms and conditions agreed upon;

Prepare executive orders and proclamations for issuance by the governor, as necessary or appropriate in coping with disasters;

Cooperate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this act and in implementing programs for disaster prevention, preparation, response, and recovery;

Maintain a register of search and rescue organizations, units, teams, or individuals operating within the state;

Assist search and rescue units to accomplish standards for equipment, training and proficiency;

Coordinate search and rescue of lost aircraft and airmen pursuant to section 21-114, Idaho Code, with aerial search operations coordinated by the Idaho transportation department, division of aeronautics;

In addition to disaster prevention measures as included in the state, local, and intergovernmental disaster plans, the office shall consider on a continuing basis steps that could be taken to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters. The governor from time to time may make recommendations to the legislature, local governments and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for prevention or reduction of the harmful consequences of disasters; and

Not limit the powers and duties of the department of transportation, division of aeronautics, as provided by sections 21-114 and 21-118, Idaho Code.

§ 46-1007. Limitations.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to:

Interfere with the course or conduct of a labor dispute, except that actions otherwise authorized by this act or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety;

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs;

Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, fire fighting forces, local emergency medical service (EMS) agencies licensed by the state department of health and welfare EMS bureau, units of the armed forces of the United States, or of any personnel thereof, when on active duty; but state, local, and intergovernmental disaster emergency plans shall place reliance upon the forces available for performance of functions related to disaster emergencies; or

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the governor to proclaim martial law or exercise any other powers vested in him under the constitution or statutes of this state independent of or in conjunction with any provisions of this act.

§ 46-1008. The governor and disaster emergencies.

Under this act, the governor may issue executive orders, proclamations and amend or rescind them. Executive orders and proclamations have the force and effect of law.

A disaster emergency shall be declared by executive order or proclamation of the governor if he finds a disaster has occurred or that the occurrence or the threat thereof is imminent. The state of disaster emergency shall continue until the governor finds that the threat or danger has passed, or the disaster has been dealt with to the extent that emergency conditions no longer exist, and when either or both of these events occur, the governor shall terminate the state of disaster emergency by executive order or proclamation; provided, however, that no state of disaster emergency may continue for longer than thirty (30) days unless the governor finds that it should be continued for another thirty (30) days or any part thereof. The legislature by concurrent resolution may terminate a state of disaster emergency at any time. Thereupon, the governor shall issue an executive order or proclamation ending the state of disaster emergency. All executive orders or proclamations issued under this subsection shall indicate the nature of the disaster, the area or areas threatened, the area subject to the proclamation, and the conditions which are causing the disaster. An executive order or proclamation shall be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public and unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster prevent or impede, be promptly filed with the Idaho office of emergency management, the office of the secretary of state and the office of the recorder of each county where the state of disaster emergency applies.

An executive order or proclamation of a state of disaster emergency shall activate the disaster response and recovery aspects of the state, local and intergovernmental disaster emergency plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this act or any other provision of law relating to disaster emergencies.

During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency, the governor is commander-in-chief of the militia and may assume command of all other forces available for emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the governor shall delegate or assign command authority by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or regulations, but nothing herein restricts his authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the disaster emergency.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law, he may:

Suspend the provisions of any regulations prescribing the procedures for conduct of public business that would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency;

Utilize all resources of the state, including, but not limited to, those sums in the disaster emergency account as he shall deem necessary to pay obligations and expenses incurred during a declared state of disaster emergency;

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency services;

Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under section 46-1012, Idaho Code, commandeer or utilize any private property, real or personal, if he finds this necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if he deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitigation, response, or recovery;

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation;

Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing or transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, and combustibles;

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing.

Whenever an emergency or a disaster has been declared to exist in Idaho by the president under the provisions of the disaster relief act of 1974 (public law 93-288, 42 U.S.C. 5121), as amended, the governor may:

Enter into agreements with the federal government for the sharing of disaster recovery expenses involving public facilities;

Require as a condition of state assistance that a local taxing district be responsible for paying forty percent (40%) of the nonfederal share of costs incurred by the local taxing district that have been determined to be eligible for reimbursement by the federal government, provided that the total local share of eligible costs for a taxing district shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the taxing district’s tax charges authorized by section 63-802, Idaho Code;

Obligate the state to pay the balance of the nonfederal share of eligible costs within local taxing entities qualifying for federal assistance; and

Enter into agreements with the federal government for the sharing of disaster assistance expenses to include individual and family grant programs.

During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency, neither the governor nor any agency of any governmental entity or political subdivision of the state shall impose restrictions on the lawful possession, transfer, sale, transport, storage, display or use of firearms or ammunition.

§ 46-1009. Local and intergovernmental disaster agencies and services.

Each county within this state shall be within the jurisdiction of and served by the office and by a county or intergovernmental agency responsible for disaster preparedness and coordination of response.

Each county shall maintain a disaster agency or participate in an intergovernmental disaster agency which, except as otherwise provided under this act, has jurisdiction over and serves the entire county, or shall have a liaison officer appointed by the county commissioners designated to facilitate the cooperation and protection of that subdivision in the work of disaster prevention, preparedness, response and recovery.

The chairman of the board of county commissioners of each county in the state shall notify the office of the manner in which the county is providing or securing disaster planning and emergency services. The chairman shall identify the person who heads the agency or acts in the capacity of liaison from which the service is obtained, and furnish additional information relating thereto as the office requires.

Each county and/or intergovernmental agency shall prepare and keep current a local or intergovernmental disaster emergency plan for its area.

The county or intergovernmental disaster agency, as the case may be, shall prepare and distribute to all appropriate officials in written form a clear and complete statement of the emergency responsibilities of all local agencies and officials and of the disaster chain of command.

§ 46-1010. Intergovernmental arrangements.

The governor may enter into interstate emergency or disaster service compacts with any state if he finds that joint action with the state is desirable in meeting common intergovernmental problems of emergency or disaster planning, prevention, response, and recovery.

Nothing in subsection (1) hereof shall be construed to limit previous or future entry into the interstate civil defense and disaster compact of this state with other states.

If any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state or political subdivision thereof evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, the person may render aid involving that skill in this state to meet an emergency or disaster proclaimed by the governor, and this state shall give due recognition to the license, certificate, or other permit.

All interstate mutual aid compacts and other interstate agreements dealing with disaster and emergency services shall be reviewed and updated at intervals not to exceed four (4) years.

When considered of mutual benefit, the governor may, subject to limitations of law, enter into intergovernmental arrangements with neighboring provinces of Canada for the purpose of exchanging disaster and emergency services.

Pursuant to an interstate agreement, personnel working for the state, its political subdivisions, municipal or public corporations, and other public agencies, may work outside the state to aid in disaster and emergency relief work; or equipment belonging to the state, its political subdivisions, municipal or public corporations, and other public agencies may be used outside the state to aid in disaster and emergency relief work. When state or local highway equipment or personnel are used in disaster relief work outside the state, arrangements shall be made, as necessary, to reimburse the state, its political subdivisions, municipal or public corporations, and other public agencies, for such work or equipment to comply with section 17, article 7 of the Idaho constitution, which provides that gasoline taxes and motor vehicle funds shall be used exclusively for the public highways of the state.

§ 46-1011. Local disaster emergencies.

A local disaster emergency may be declared only by a mayor or chairman of the county commissioners within their respective political subdivisions. It shall not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of seven (7) days except by or with the consent of the governing board of the political subdivision. Any order or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating a local disaster emergency shall be given prompt and general publicity and shall be filed promptly with the local county recorder.

The effect of a declaration of a local disaster emergency is to activate the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local or intergovernmental disaster emergency plans and to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder.

No intergovernmental agency or official thereof may declare a local disaster emergency, unless expressly authorized by the agreement pursuant to which the agency functions. However, an intergovernmental disaster agency shall provide aid and services in accordance with the agreement pursuant to which it functions.

§ 46-1012. Compensation.

Each person within this state shall conduct himself and keep and manage his affairs and property in ways that will reasonably assist and will not unreasonably detract from the ability of the state, other political subdivisions, and the public to successfully meet disaster emergencies. This obligation includes appropriate personal service and use or restriction on the use of property in time of disaster emergency. This act neither increases nor decreases these obligations but recognizes their existence under the constitution and statutes of this state. Compensation for services or for the taking or use of property shall be only to the extent that obligations recognized herein are exceeded in a particular case and then only to the extent that the claimant may not be deemed to have volunteered his services or property without compensation.

No personal services may be compensated by the state or any subdivision or agency thereof, except pursuant to statute or local law or ordinance.

Compensation for property shall be only if the property was commandeered or otherwise used in coping with a disaster emergency and its use or destruction was ordered by the governor or his representative.

Any person claiming compensation for the use, damage, loss, or destruction of property under this act shall file a claim therefor with the office in the form and manner the office provides.

Unless the amount of compensation on account of property damaged, lost, or destroyed is agreed upon between the claimant and the office, the amount of compensation shall be calculated in the same manner as compensation due for taking of property pursuant to the condemnation laws of this state.

§ 46-1013. Communications.

The office shall ascertain what means exist for rapid and efficient communications in times of disaster emergencies. The office shall consider the desirability of supplementing these communication resources or of integrating them into a comprehensive state or state-federal telecommunications or other communication system or network. The office shall make recommendations to the governor as appropriate.

§ 46-1014. Mutual aid.

Political subdivisions not participating in the intergovernmental arrangements pursuant to this act nevertheless shall be encouraged and assisted by the office to conclude suitable arrangement for furnishing mutual aid in coping with disasters. The arrangements shall include provisions of aid by persons and units in public employ.

In passing upon local disaster plans, the office shall consider whether they contain adequate provisions for the rendering and receipt of mutual aid.

§ 46-1015. Weather modification.

The office shall keep continuously appraised of weather conditions which present danger of precipitation or other climatic activity severe enough to constitute a disaster. If the office determines that precipitation that may result from weather modification operations, either by itself or in conjunction with other precipitation or climatic conditions or activity, would create or contribute to the severity of a disaster, it shall direct the officer or agency empowered to issue permits for weather modification operations to suspend the issuance of the permits. Thereupon, no permits may be issued until the office informs the officer or agency that the danger has passed.

§ 46-1016. Liability for property damage, bodily injury or death.

No person, partnership, corporation, association, the state of Idaho or any political subdivision thereof or other entity who owns, leases, controls, occupies or maintains any building or premises which shall have been designated by proper authority for civil defense as a shelter from destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States shall be liable to any person for property damages, bodily injury or death resulting from or caused by the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or omission or in any way arising from the designation of such premises or buildings as a shelter when such person has entered or gone upon or into said building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge therein during destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or during tests ordered by lawful authority, except for acts of wilful negligence by the owner or occupant of such building or premises or other person responsible for the maintenance thereof, or by his servants, agents or employees.

§ 46-1017. Immunity.

Neither the state, nor the office, nor any political subdivision thereof nor other agencies, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, the agents, employees or representatives of any of them engaged in any civil defense, disaster or emergency and the planning or preparation for the same, or disaster or emergency relief activities, acting under proper authority, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct or gross negligence, any person, firm, corporation or entity under contract with them to provide equipment or work to be used in civil defense, disaster or emergency planning, preparation or relief, while complying with or attempting to comply with this act or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of the act, shall be liable for the death of or any injury to persons or damage to property as a result of such activity. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this act or under the worker’s compensation law or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

§ 46-1018. Interstate mutual aid compact.

The state of Idaho hereby enacts into law and enters into the interstate mutual aid compact with those states who agree and enact the interstate mutual aid compact in accordance with the terms of the compact, which compact is substantially as follows:

Article I

The purpose of this compact is to provide voluntary assistance among participating states in responding to any disaster or imminent disaster that overextends the ability of local and state governments to reduce, counteract, or remove the danger. Assistance may include but is not limited to rescue, fire, police, medical, communication, and transportation services and facilities to cope with problems which require use of special equipment, trained personnel, or personnel in large numbers not locally available.

Article II

Article I, Section 10, of the Constitution of the United States permits a state to enter into an agreement or compact with another state, subject to the consent of Congress. Congress, through enactment of 50 U.S.C. 2281(g) and 2283 and the executive branch, by issuance of Executive Order No. 10186 of December 1, 1950, encourages the states to enter into emergency, disaster, and civil defense mutual aid agreements or pacts.

Article III

It is agreed by participating states that the following conditions will guide implementation of the compact:

Participating states through their designated officials are authorized to request and receive assistance from a participating state. Requests will be granted only if the requesting state is committed to the mitigation of the emergency and other resources are not immediately available.

Requests for assistance may be verbal or in writing. If the request is made by other than written communication, it must be confirmed in writing as soon as practical after the request. A written request shall provide an itemization of equipment and operators, types of expertise, and personnel or other resources needed. Each request must be signed by an authorized official.

Personnel and equipment of the aiding state made available to the requesting state shall, whenever possible, remain under the control and direction of the aiding state. The activities of personnel and equipment of the aiding state must be coordinated by the requesting state.

An aiding state has the right to withdraw some or all of its personnel and equipment whenever the personnel and equipment are needed by that state. Notice of intention to withdraw should be communicated to the requesting state as soon as possible.

Article IV

The requesting state shall reimburse the aiding state as soon as possible after the receipt by the requesting state of an itemized voucher requesting reimbursement of costs.

Any state rendering aid pursuant to this compact must be reimbursed by the state receiving such aid for the cost of compensation and death benefits to injured officers, agents, or employees and their dependents or representatives if such officers, agents, or employees sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this arrangement and such payments are made in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within the aiding state.

Article V

All privileges and immunities from liability, exemptions from law, ordinances, and rules and all pension, disability relief, workers’ compensation, and other benefits that apply to the activity of officers, agents, or employees when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of their respective political subdivisions apply to them to the same extent while engaged in the performance of any of their functions and duties extraterritorially under the provisions of this compact.

All privileges and immunities from liability, exemptions from law, ordinances, and rules and workers’ compensation and other benefits that apply to duly enrolled or registered volunteers when performing their respective functions at the request of their state and within its territorial limits apply to the same extent while performing their functions extraterritorially under the provisions of this compact. Volunteers may include but are not limited to physicians, surgeons, nurses, dentists, structural engineers, and trained search and rescue volunteers.

The signatory states, their political subdivisions, municipal or public corporations, and other public agencies shall hold harmless the corresponding entities and personnel thereof from the other states with respect to the acts and omissions of its own agents and employees that occur while providing assistance pursuant to the common plan.

Nothing of this arrangement may be construed as repealing or impairing any existing interstate mutual aid agreements.

Upon enactment of this compact by two (2) or more states, and annually by each January 1 thereafter, the participating states will exchange with each other the names of officials designated to request and provide services under this arrangement. In accordance with the cooperative nature of this arrangement, it is permissible and desirable for the states to exchange operational procedures to be followed in requesting assistance and reimbursing expenses.

This compact becomes effective and is binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two (2) states. Thereafter, this compact becomes effective and binding as to any other state upon similar action by such state.

This compact remains binding upon a party state until it enacts a law repealing the compact and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states. An actual withdrawal may not take effect until the 30th consecutive day after the notice has been sent. Such withdrawal does not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed under this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

§ 46-1018A. Emergency management assistance compact.

The legislature of the state of Idaho hereby authorizes the governor of the state of Idaho to enter into a compact on behalf of the state of Idaho with any other state legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I

ARTICLE II

PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES

It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

Review individual state hazards analysis [analyses] and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, civil disorders, insurgency or enemy attack.

Review party states’ individual emergency plans and develop a plan which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency.

Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans.

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries.

Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material.

Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

Provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the above responsibilities.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this compact shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within thirty (30) days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, including, but not limited to, fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue.

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed.

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party’s response and a point of contact at that location.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV

ARTICLE V

ARTICLE VI

ARTICLE VII

ARTICLE VIII

ARTICLE IX

ARTICLE X

ARTICLE XII

ARTICLE XIII

§ 46-1019. Emergency response. [Repealed.]